Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-116
Drainage improvements; appeal; effect upon progress of work; bond.

No appeal taken in pursuance of the provisions of section 31-115 shall in any manner affect the progress of the construction of the proposed improvement; Provided, the petitioners shall enter into a good and sufficient bond to be approved by the district court or by the judge thereof at chambers, and filed with the clerk of the court, conditioned for the payment of all damages and costs that the appellant may sustain on the trial of the appeal.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 16, p. 242;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 16, p. 458;

R.S.1913, § 1733;

C.S.1922, § 1680;

C.S.1929, § 31-116;

R.S.1943, § 31-116.